src/main/resources/hyph/en.xml
        4ves.
        ves4te
        ve4te
        vet3er
        ve4ty
        vi5ali
        5vian
        5vide.
        5vided
        4v3iden
        5vides
        5vidi
        v3if
        vi5gn
        vik4
        2vil
        5vilit
        v3i3liz
        v1in
        4vi4na
        v2inc
        vin5d
        4ving
        vio3l
        v3io4r
        vi1ou
        vi4p
        vi5ro
        vis3it
        vi3so
        vi3su
        4viti
        vit3r
        4vity
        3viv
        5vo.
        voi4
        3vok
        vo4la
        v5ole
        5volt
        3volv
        vom5i
        vor5ab
        vori4
        vo4ry
        vo4ta
        4votee
        4vv4
        v4y
        w5abl
        2wac
        wa5ger
        wag5o
        wait5
        w5al.
        wam4
        war4t
        was4t
        wa1te
        wa5ver
        w1b
        wea5rie
        weath3
        wed4n
        weet3
        wee5v
        wel4l
        w1er
        west3
        w3ev
        whi4
        wi2
        wil2
        will5in
        win4de
        win4g
        wir4
        3wise
        with3
        wiz5
        w4k
        wl4es
        wl3in
        w4no
        1wo2
        wom1
        wo5ven
        w5p
        wra4
        wri4
        writa4
        w3sh
        ws4l
        ws4pe
        w5s4t
        4wt
        wy4
        x1a
        xac5e
        x4ago
        xam3
        x4ap
        xas5
        x3c2
        x1e
        xe4cuto
        x2ed
        xer4i
        xe5ro
        x1h
        xhi2
        xhil5
        xhu4
        x3i
        xi5a
        xi5c
        xi5di
        x4ime
        xi5miz
        x3o
        x4ob
        x3p
        xpan4d
        xpecto5
        xpe3d
        x1t2
        x3ti
        x1u
        xu3a
        xx4
        y5ac
        3yar4
        y5at
        y1b
        y1c
        y2ce
        yc5er
        y3ch
        ych4e
        ycom4
        ycot4
        y1d
        y5ee
        y1er
        y4erf
        yes4
        ye4t
        y5gi
        4y3h
        y1i
        y3la
        ylla5bl
        y3lo
        y5lu
        ymbol5
        yme4
        ympa3
        yn3chr
        yn5d
        yn5g
        yn5ic
        5ynx
        y1o4
        yo5d
        y4o5g
        yom4
        yo5net
        y4ons
        y4os
        y4ped
        yper5
        yp3i
        y3po
        y4poc
        yp2ta
        y5pu
        yra5m
        yr5ia
        y3ro
        yr4r
        ys4c
        y3s2e
        ys3ica
        ys3io
        3ysis
        y4so
        yss4
        ys1t
        ys3ta
        ysur4
        y3thin
        yt3ic
        y1w
        za1
        z5a2b
        zar2
        4zb
        2ze
        ze4n
        ze4p
        z1er
        ze3ro
        zet4
        2z1i
        z4il
        z4is
        5zl
        4zm
        1zo
        zo4m
        zo5ol
        zte4
        4z1z2
        z4zy
        .con5gr
        .de5riva
        .dri5v4
        .eth1y6l1
        .eu4ler
        .ev2
        .ever5si5b
        .ga4s1om1
        .ge4ome
        .ge5ot1
        .he3mo1
        .he3p6a
        .he3roe
        .in5u2t
        .kil2n3i
        .ko6r1te1
        .le6ices
        .me4ga1l
        .met4ala
        .mim5i2c1
        .mi1s4ers
        .ne6o3f
        .noe1th
        .non1e2m
        .poly1s
        .post1am
        .pre1am
        .rav5en1o
        .semi5
        .sem4ic
        .semid6
        .semip4
        .semir4
        .sem6is4
        .semiv4
        .sph6in1
        .spin1o
        .ta5pes1tr
        .te3legr
        .to6pog
        .to2q
        .un3at5t
        .un5err5
        .vi2c3ar
        .we2b1l
        .re1e4c
        a5bolic
        a2cabl
        af6fish
        am1en3ta5b
        anal6ys
        ano5a2c
        ans5gr
        ans3v
        anti1d
        an3ti1n2
        anti1re
        a4pe5able
        ar3che5t
        ar2range
        as5ymptot
        ath3er1o1s
        at6tes.
        augh4tl
        au5li5f
        av3iou
        back2er.
        ba6r1onie
        ba1thy
        bbi4t
        be2vie
        bi5d2if
        bil2lab
        bio5m
        bi1orb
        bio1rh
        b1i3tive
        blan2d1
        blin2d1
        blon2d2
        bor1no5
        bo2t1u1l
        brus4q
        bus6i2er
        bus6i2es
        buss4ing
        but2ed.
        but4ted
        cad5e1m
        cat1a1s2
        4chs.
        chs3hu
        chie5vo
        cig3a3r
        cin2q
        cle4ar
        co6ph1o3n
        cous2ti
        cri3tie
        croc1o1d
        cro5e2co
        c2tro3me6c
        1cu2r1ance
        2d3alone
        data1b
        dd5a5b
        d2d5ib
        de4als.
        de5clar1
        de2c5lina
        de3fin3iti
        de2mos
        des3ic
        de2tic
        dic1aid
        dif5fra
        3di1methy
        di2ren
        di2rer
        2d1lead
        2d1li2e
        3do5word
        dren1a5l
        drif2t1a
        d1ri3pleg5
        drom3e5d
        d3tab
        du2al.
        du1op1o1l
        ea4n3ies
        e3chas
        edg1l
        ed1uling
        eli2t1is
        e1loa
        en1dix
        eo3grap
        1e6p3i3neph1
        e2r3i4an.
        e3spac6i
        eth1y6l1ene
        5eu2clid1
        feb1rua
        fermi1o
        3fich
        fit5ted.
        fla1g6el
        flow2er.
        3fluor
        gen2cy.
        ge3o1d
        ght1we
        g1lead
        get2ic.
        4g1lish
        5glo5bin
        1g2nac
        gnet1ism
        gno5mo
        g2n1or.
        g2noresp
        2g1o4n3i1za
        graph5er.
        griev1
        g1utan
        hair1s
        ha2p3ar5r
        hatch1
        hex2a3
        hite3sid
        h3i5pel1a4
        hnau3z
        ho6r1ic.
        h2t1eou
        hypo1tha
        id4ios
        ifac1et
        ign4it
        ignit1er
        i4jk
        im3ped3a
        infra1s2
        i5nitely.
        irre6v3oc
        i1tesima
        ith5i2l
        itin5er5ar
        janu3a
        japan1e2s
        je1re1m
        1ke6ling
        1ki5netic
        1kovian
        k3sha
        la4c3i5e
        lai6n3ess
        lar5ce1n
        l3chai
        l3chil6d1
        lead6er.
        lea4s1a
        1lec3ta6b
        le3g6en2dre
        1le1noid
        lith1o5g
        ll1fl
        l2l3ish
        l5mo3nell
        lo1bot1o1
        lo2ges.
        load4ed.
        load6er.
        l3tea
        lth5i2ly
        lue1p
        1lunk3er
        1lum5bia.
        3lyg1a1mi
        ly5styr
        ma1la1p
        m2an.
        man3u1sc
        mar1gin1
        medi2c
        med3i3cin
        medio6c1
        me3gran3
        m2en.
        3mi3da5b
        3milita
        mil2l1ag
        mil5li5li
        mi6n3is.
        mi1n2ut1er
        mi1n2ut1est
        m3ma1b
        5maph1ro1
        5moc1ra1t
        mo5e2las
        mol1e5c
        mon4ey1l
        mono3ch
        mo4no1en
        moro6n5is
        mono1s6
        moth4et2
        m1ou3sin
        m5shack2
        mu2dro
        mul2ti5u
        n3ar4chs.
        n3ch2es1t
        ne3back
        2ne1ski
        n1dieck
        nd3thr
        nfi6n3ites
        4n5i4an.
        nge5nes
        ng1ho
        ng1spr
        nk3rup
        n5less
        5noc3er1os
        nom1a6l
        nom5e1no
        n1o1mist
        non1eq
        non1i4so
        5nop1oly.
        no1vemb
        ns5ceiv
        ns4moo
        ntre1p
        obli2g1
        o3chas
        odel3li
        odit1ic
        oerst2
        oke1st
        o3les3ter
        oli3gop1o1
        o1lo3n4om
        o3mecha6
        onom1ic
        o3norma
        o3no2t1o3n
        o3nou
        op1ism.
        or4tho3ni4t
        orth1ri
        or5tively
        o4s3pher
        o5test1er
        o5tes3tor
        oth3e1o1s
        ou3ba3do
        o6v3i4an.
        oxi6d1ic
        pal6mat
        parag6ra4
        par4a1le
        param4
        para3me
        pee2v1
        phi2l3ant
        phi5lat1e3l
        pi2c1a3d
        pli2c1ab
        pli5nar
        poin3ca
        1pole.
        poly1e
        po3lyph1ono
        1prema3c
        pre1neu
        pres2pli
        pro2cess
        proc3i3ty.
        pro2g1e
        3pseu2d
        pseu3d6o3d2
        pseu3d6o3f2
        pto3mat4
        p5trol3
        pu5bes5c
        quain2t1e
        qu6a3si3
        quasir6
        quasis6
        quin5tes5s
        qui3v4ar
        r1abolic
        3rab1o1loi
        ra3chu
        r3a3dig
        radi1o6g
        r2amen
        3ra4m5e1triz
        ra3mou
        ra5n2has
        ra1or
        r3bin1ge
        re2c3i1pr
        rec5t6ang
        re4t1ribu
        r3ial.
        riv1o1l
        6rk.
        rk1ho
        r1krau
        6rks.
        r5le5qu
        ro1bot1
        ro5e2las
        ro5epide1
        ro3mesh
        ro1tron
        r3pau5li
        rse1rad1i
        r1thou
        r1treu
        r1veil
        rz1sc
        sales3c
        sales5w
        5sa3par5il
        sca6p1er
        sca2t1ol
        s4chitz
        schro1ding1
        1sci2utt
        scrap4er.
        scy4th1
        sem1a1ph
        se3mes1t
        se1mi6t5ic
        sep3temb
        shoe1st
        sid2ed.
        side5st
        side5sw
        si5resid
        sky1sc
        3slova1kia
        3s2og1a1my
        so2lute
        3s2pace
        1s2pacin
        spe3cio
        spher1o
        spi2c1il
        spokes5w
        sports3c
        sports3w
        s3qui3to
        s2s1a3chu1
        ss3hat
        s2s3i4an.
        s5sign5a3b
        1s2tamp
        s2t1ant5shi
        star3tli
        sta1ti
        st5b
        1stor1ab
        strat1a1g
        strib5ut
        st5scr
        stu1pi4d1
        styl1is
        su2per1e6
        1sync
        1syth3i2
        swimm6
        5tab1o1lism
        ta3gon.
        talk1a5
        t1a1min
        t6ap6ath
        5tar2rh
        tch1c
        tch3i1er
        t1cr
        teach4er.
        tele2g
        tele1r6o
        3ter1gei
        ter2ic.
        t3ess2es
        tha4l1am
        tho3don
        th1o5gen1i
        tho1k2er
        thy4l1an
        thy3sc
        2t3i4an.
        ti2n3o1m
        t1li2er
        tolo2gy
        tot3ic
        trai3tor1
        tra1vers
        travers3a3b
        treach1e
        tr4ial.
        3tro1le1um
        trof4ic.
        tro3fit
        tro1p2is
        3trop1o5les
        3trop1o5lis
        t1ro1pol3it
        tsch3ie
        ttrib1ut1
        turn3ar
        t1wh
        ty2p5al
        ua3drati
        uad1ratu
        u5do3ny
        uea1m
        u2r1al.
        uri4al.
        us2er.
        v1ativ
        v1oir5du1
        va6guer
        vaude3v
        1verely.
        v1er1eig
        ves1tite
        vi1vip3a3r
        voice1p
        waste3w6a2
        wave1g4
        w3c
        week1n
        wide5sp
        wo4k1en
        wrap3aro
        writ6er.
        x1q
        xquis3
        y5che3d
        ym5e5try
        y1stro
        yes5ter1y
        z3ian.
        z3o1phr
        z2z3w
    </patterns>

</hyphenation-info>
